Massachusetts, session 194th, H2095.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition
is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 204. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
“Retaliatory action”, the discharge, suspension, or demotion of an employee, or other
adverse employment action taken against an employee in the terms and conditions of
employment.
of 3

(b) Any provision in a settlement agreement between an employer and an employee,
including but not limited to a non-disclosure agreement, that waives a substantive or procedural
right or remedy of the employee relating to a claim of discrimination, non-payment of wages or
benefits, retaliation, harassment or violation of public policy in employment, including but not
limited to prohibiting the disclosure of information relative to any such claim shall be valid and
enforceable for only 3 years from the date the agreement takes effect.
(c) This section shall not render void or unenforceable the remainder of the contract or
agreement. This section shall not apply to the terms of any collective bargaining agreement
between an employer and the bona fide collective bargaining representative of that employer’s
employees.
(d) An employer shall not take any retaliatory action against an employee because the
employee does not enter into an agreement that includes a provision deemed void or
unenforceable pursuant to this section.
(g) Whoever violates this section or enforces or attempts to enforce a provision deemed
void and unenforceable under this section shall be liable for reasonable attorney’s fees and costs
associated with litigation.
(h) A person aggrieved by a violation of this section may, within 3 years after such
violation, institute a civil action in superior court. All remedies available in common law tort
actions shall be available to prevailing plaintiffs. The court may also order the payment of
reasonable costs and attorney’s fees. The rights and remedies contained in this section shall not
be exclusive and shall not preempt other procedures or remedies available.
of 3

SECTION 2. This act shall apply to all settlement agreements, including but not limited
to non-disclosure agreements, entered into, renewed, modified, or amended on or after the
effective date of this act.
of 3